Utah statutes.
53-2a-302.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Emergency responder":

(a)  means a person in the public or private sector:

(i)  who has special skills, qualification, training, knowledge, or experience, whether or not possessing a license, certificate, permit, or other official recognition for the skills, qualification, training, knowledge, or experience, that would benefit a participating political subdivision in responding to a locally declared emergency or in an authorized drill or exercise; and

(ii) whom a participating political subdivision requests or authorizes to assist in responding to a locally declared emergency or in an authorized drill or exercise; and

(b)  includes:

(i)  a law enforcement officer;

(ii)  a firefighter;

(iii)  an emergency medical services worker;

(iv)  a physician, nurse, or other public health worker;

(v)  an emergency management official;

(vi)  a public works worker;

(vii)  a building inspector;

(viii)  an architect, engineer, or other design professional; or

(ix)  a person with specialized equipment operations skills or training or with any other skills needed to provide aid in a declared emergency.

(2)  "Participating political subdivision" means each county, municipality, public safety district, and public safety interlocal entity that has not adopted a resolution under Section 53-2a-306 withdrawing itself from the statewide mutual aid system.

(3)  "Public safety district" means a local district under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Local Districts, or special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act, that provides public safety service.

(4)  "Public safety interlocal entity" means an interlocal entity under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, that provides public safety service.

(5)  "Public safety service" means a service provided to the public to protect life and property and includes fire protection, police protection, emergency medical service, and hazardous material response service.

(6)  "Requesting political subdivision" means a participating political subdivision that requests emergency assistance under Section 53-2a-207 from one or more other participating political subdivisions.

(7)  "Responding political subdivision" means a participating political subdivision that responds to a request under Section 53-2a-307 from a requesting political subdivision.

(8)  "State" means the state of Utah.

(9)  "Statewide mutual aid system" or "system" means the aggregate of all participating political subdivisions and the state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

